Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.086

Major political party.

"Major political party" means a political party whose nominees for president and vice president received at least five percent of the total vote cast at the last presidential election. A political party qualifying as a major political party under this section retains such status until the next presidential election at which the presidential and vice presidential candidates of that party do not achieve at least five percent of the vote.

[ 2013 c 11 s 4; 2004 c 271 s 103.]